Connecticut, session 2026, SB00178.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
___ dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection for the purpose of providing
a grant-in-aid to the city of Middletown for the construction of a fire
station on Connecticut Route 3 in said city.